Utah statutes.
53A-1a-901.    Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Extended-day kindergarten" means a kindergarten program that provides:
(a)  at least the same number of instructional hours per school year as first
grade, as established under State Board of Education rule; or
(b)  additional instruction hours that are outside the regular school year,
including summer programs.
(2)  "Part-day kindergarten" means a kindergarten program that provides fewer
instructional hours than first grade, as established under State Board of
Education rule.
